California statutes. Financial Code
(f) To increase the competitiveness of California’s small businesses in the world economy and the creation of jobs.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1040, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Definitions [32200. - 32219.]

32200.

Subject to additional definitions contained in Division 15 (commencing with Section 31000) and this division which are applicable to specific provisions of these divisions and unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article apply throughout this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32201.

“Alternative energy system” means any device or combination of devices which conserves or produces heat, process heat, space heating, water heating, steam, space cooling, refrigeration, mechanical energy, electricity, or energy in any form convertible to these uses, which does not expend or use conventional energy fuels, except when such conventional energy fuels are used as a back up energy system for such alternative energy system or in conjunction with an alternative energy system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32202.

“Conventional energy fuel” means any fuel derived from petroleum deposits, including but not limited to oil, heating oil, gasoline, fuel oil, or natural gas, including liquified natural gas, or nuclear fissionable materials. “Conventional energy fuel” includes energy produced by the use of such fuels.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32203.

“Small business” means a business defined as an eligible small business as set forth in Section 121.3-10 of Part 121, Chapter 1, Title 13 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32204.

“State Controller” means the State Controller or any person to whom the State Controller delegates the authority to act for him or her in the particular matter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32205.

“Rules Committee” means the rules committee of the State Senate or any person to whom the rules committee of the State Senate delegates to act for it in the particular matter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32206.

“Speaker” means the Speaker of the State Assembly or any person to whom the Speaker of the Assembly delegates the authority to act for him in the particular matter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32207.

“Corporation” means the State Assistance Fund for Enterprise Business and Industrial Development Corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 25, Sec. 1.   Effective March 17, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

32208.

“Energy Commission” means the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 161.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

32209.

“ Alternative energy business firm” means any small business engaged primarily in the business of the design, manufacture, production, assembly, distribution, marketing, sale, transportation, or installation of an alternative energy system, or, any small business engaged primarily in the business of producing, transmitting, or selling energy produced by an eligible alternative energy system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32210.

“Board” means the board of directors of the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32211.

“President” means the president of the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32212.

“Finance officer” means the director of the finance division of the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32215.

“Governor” means the Governor of the State of California or any person to whom the Governor of the State of California delegates the authority to act for him in the particular matter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32216.

“Savings-investment ratio” means an analysis of the proposed system in which energy cost savings are added to other net benefits and costs from operation, maintenance, replacements, depreciation, tax credits and financing costs, and divided by initial investment costs. All benefits and costs are to be evaluated in present or constant dollars.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32217.

“Life cycle cost analysis” means an analysis of a proposed system in which all costs and benefits are evaluated over the expected life of the system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32218.

“Minimum economic feasibility” means that the net savings or benefits of an investment exceed the net costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32219.

“Special projects” means any financing assistance or other program undertaken by the corporation pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 32720) of Chapter 6.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Corporate Matters [32300. - 32352.5.]



  ARTICLE 1. Creation of the Corporation [32300. - 32301.]

32300.

The Legislature hereby authorizes the creation of a nonprofit corporation pursuant to the provisions of the Nonprofit Corporation Law (Part 1 (commencing with Section 9000), Division 2, Title 1 of the Corporations Code) on January 1, 1981.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32301.

Except as otherwise provided in this division:

(a) The Nonprofit Corporation Law shall apply to the corporation. However, whenever any provision of the Nonprofit Corporation Law conflicts with any provision of this division, the provision of the Nonprofit Corporation Law shall not apply and the provision of this division shall apply.

(b) The Business and Industrial Development Corporation Law (Division 15 (commencing with Section
 31000)) shall apply to this corporation. However, whenever any provision of the Business and Industrial Development Corporation Law conflicts with any provision of this division, the provision of the Business and Industrial Development Corporation Law shall not apply and the provision of this division shall apply.

(c) The Small Business Development Corporation Law (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 5 of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code) shall apply to the corporation, except that, to the extent of any conflict between those provisions and this division, the provisions of this division shall prevail.

(d) Whenever a conflict exists between any of the following acts, the conflict shall be resolved by applying the conflicting provision contained in the act in order of preference as listed in this subdivision, and the applicable provision shall prevail
 over the other conflicting provisions:

(1) The Business and Industrial Development Corporations Law (Division 15 (commencing with Section 31000)).

(2) The Small Business Development Corporation Law (Ch. 1 (commencing with Section 14000), Pt. 5, Div. 3, Corp. C.).

(3) The Nonprofit Corporation Law (Div. 2 (commencing with Section 5000) Pt. 1, Corp. C.).

(e) The State Assistance Fund for Enterprise, Business, and Industrial Development Corporation (SAFE-BIDCO), which was established by this division, meets the definition of a community development financial institution for purposes of eligibility consistent with Sections 12209, 17053.57, and 23657 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 939, Sec. 1.   Effective September 27, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Corporate Name [32310. - 32310.]

32310.

The name of this corporation shall be: State Assistance Fund for Enterprise, Business and Industrial Development Corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1040, Sec. 6.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Board of Directors [32320. - 32326.]

32320.

Except as provided in Sections 32325 and 32352.5, the board of directors of the corporation shall consist of six members, two official and four public directors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 25, Sec. 4.   Effective March 17, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

32321.

(a) The official members of the board shall be:

(1) A member of the Governor’s cabinet, or his or her designee.

(2) One member of the Energy Commission, selected and appointed by the members of the Energy Commission.

(b) The public members of the board shall be:

(1) One member
 selected and appointed by the Senate Rules Committee.

(2) One member selected and appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(3) Two members selected and appointed by the Governor as follows:

(A) One member with a minimum three years’ experience as an owner, partner, officer, or employee of a California-based small business.

(B) One member with a minimum three years’ experience as an officer or employee of a financial institution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 25, Sec. 5.   Effective March 17, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

32322.

(a) The terms of official members of the board shall coincide with their official terms of office, except in the case of the member selected and appointed by the members of the Energy Commission, who shall serve on the board until he or she is no longer a member of the Energy Commission or until he or she is replaced by a vote of the Energy Commission.

(b) The public members of the board shall be appointed by the Rules Committee, Speaker, and Governor in such a manner that they shall hold office for overlapping terms. At the time of the appointment of first directors,
 the first term of the directors appointed by the Rules Committee and Speaker shall be approximately two years. At the time of the appointment of first directors, the first term of the directors appointed by the Governor shall be approximately one year for one director and approximately three years for two directors. Thereafter, the terms of all public directors shall be three years. Directors shall be eligible for reappointment for an unlimited number of terms.

(c) A public director’s tenure shall continue until his successor has been appointed and has taken his position on the board.

(d) In the case of public members, vacancies shall be filled by appointment of the respective appointing authority for the unexpired remainder of the term.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32323.

(a) The directors selected and appointed by the Governor, Rules Committee, and Speaker shall meet the requirements of subdivision (d) of Section 31152.

(b) The directors shall hold office until the directors of the State Assistance Fund for Enterprise, Business and Industrial Development Corporation take office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1040, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

32324.

(a) The official directors shall serve without compensation, except that they shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties, or at the discretion of the board, may receive a reasonable per diem payment and mileage charge as reimbursement for living and traveling expenses incurred in the performance of duties away from their principal areas of residence. The amount of such per diem payment shall not exceed the rate established by the state for any calendar day. No director shall
 receive per diem both in the course of his official duties and from the corporation for the same calendar day.

(b) All other directors may, at the discretion of the board, be paid a stipend in addition to reimbursement for their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties or reasonable per diem payment and mileage charge. The amount of any per diem payment shall not exceed the rate established by the state for any calendar day. The board shall determine the amount of the stipend received by public directors, provided, however, that such stipend shall not exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for any calendar day. Additionally, public directors may not receive stipends for more than 25 days in any calendar year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 25, Sec. 6.   Effective March 17, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

32325.

If the corporation becomes a federal Community Development Financial Institution (CDFI), in addition to the official and public directors provided for in Section 32321, the board may select not more than three private directors to assist the board in managing the corporation, subject to the following:

(a) Private directors shall serve on the board in an advisory and voluntary capacity.

(b) Each private director shall be knowledgeable
 about the CDFI target market.

(c) At the discretion of the board, private directors shall be eligible to receive compensation, subject to the limitations contained in subdivision (b) of Section 32324.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 25, Sec. 7.   Effective March 17, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

32326.

The board of directors of the corporation shall establish a loan committee, which shall review, rank, and approve or disapprove applications for loans under this division in accordance with procedures and criteria adopted by the board of directors. The loan committee shall consist of persons appointed by, and who shall serve at the pleasure of, the board of directors of the corporation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1040, Sec. 9.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Management of the Corporation [32330. - 32332.]

32330.

The management of the corporation shall be conducted by the board of directors, subject to the following limitations:

(a) All action taken by the board of directors shall require the approval of a majority of the board present at a meeting at which there is a quorum or by unanimous written consent of all directors.

(b) The board of directors shall file revised articles of incorporation with the Secretary of State no later than January 30, 1990.

(c) The board of
 directors shall apply for a revised license as a California Business and Industrial Development Corporation by March 1, 1990.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1040, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

32331.

The operations of the corporation shall be directed by the president of the corporation, who shall be selected and appointed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32332.

The corporation shall adopt bylaws, which shall include provisions governing the election of officers; the establishment and functions of committees; eligibility criteria for loan applications and application procedures; procedures for the deposit and sale of government guaranteed securities; and the establishment of loan loss reserves.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1040, Sec. 10.2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Powers, Exclusions and Prohibitions [32350. - 32352.5.]

32350.

(a) The corporation may appoint such agents and employees as it requires, and determine their qualifications, duties, terms of employment, and compensation. The corporation shall adopt personnel rules and regulations applicable to its employees.

(b) The corporation may contract for such legal counsel as in its judgment is necessary or advisable to enable it to carry out its purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32351.

The corporation shall not provide financing assistance to any business firm in this state unless such business firm meets the financial and eligibility criteria for the specific type of financial assistance to be provided by the corporation, including, where appropriate, prior application to a bank or other financial institution for a loan or other financial assistance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1338, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

32352.

The corporation shall (a) be empowered to do and perform all acts contemplated for a business and industrial development corporation, and (b) upon approval of the Small Business Development Board, perform acts contemplated for a small business development corporation, pursuant to Part 5 (commencing with Section 14000) of the Corporations Code.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, upon approval by the Small Business Development Board of the corporation’s application to become a small business development corporation pursuant to this section, the sum of seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000)
 shall be transferred from the State Enterprise Loan Fund for deposit in the Small Business Expansion Fund created pursuant to Section 14029 of the Corporations Code for immediate transfer to a loan fund established pursuant to Section 14045 of the Corporations Code. Upon suspension of the corporation as a small business development corporation, the funds shall be transferred to the Small Business Expansion Fund pursuant to Section 14025 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1040, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

32352.5.

(a) If the corporation becomes a small business development corporation pursuant to Section 32352, the official and public members of the board of directors shall, within 30 days thereafter, appoint three additional directors to the board, who shall be residents of the region to be served by the corporation when acting as a small business development corporation.

(b) For purposes of this section, the three regional directors appointed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be
 appointed by the official and public members of the board as full voting members of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 25, Sec. 8.   Effective March 17, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Corporate Finances [32400. - 32423.]



  ARTICLE 1. Corporate Accounts [32400. - 32404.]

32400.

The financial accounts and records of the corporation shall be kept by the finance officer according to policies and rules which the board shall adopt.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32401.

The corporation shall adopt as its fiscal year the period from July 1st to and including the following June 30th.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32402.

In addition to other accounts the board may establish, the financial accounts of the corporation shall include:

(a) A general operating account.

(b) A general reserve account.

(c) An enterprise loan fund.

(d) A government guaranteed securities trust fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1040, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

32403.

Except as otherwise provided for in this division, all funds received by the corporation shall be deposited in the general operating account of the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32404.

Beginning with the fiscal year which begins July 1, 1982, and each fiscal year thereafter, the board shall not adopt any budget for the corporation in which the projected total operating expenditures exceed the expected balance of the general operating account.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Government Guaranteed Securities Trust Fund [32420. - 32423.]

32420.

In this article “trust fund” means the government guaranteed securities trust fund of the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32421.

The finance officer shall place into the trust fund all securities held by the corporation which carry a guarantee of repayment issued by the Small Business Administration or guarantee of repayment issued by any other governmental authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32422.

According to policies and regulations which the board shall adopt, the finance officer shall use his or her best efforts to sell the guaranteed portion of the securities held in the trust fund to private investors or the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32423.

The proceeds of the sale of government guaranteed securities shall be allocated to the accounts of the corporation in the following manner:

(a) That portion of the proceeds of the sale of government guaranteed securities which represents the purchase of the principal amount of the securities shall be credited to the enterprise loan fund of the corporation; and

(b) That portion of the proceeds of the sale of government guaranteed
 securities which represents the purchase of the future interest earnings of the securities shall be credited to the general operating account of the corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 25, Sec. 9.   Effective March 17, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Loan Operations [32600. - 32601.]

32600.

(a) The finance officer shall not execute any loan that is not:

(1) Approved for guarantee by the Small Business Administration, under that agency’s prevailing standards for loans of similar type, purpose, amount, and duration that are in effect at the time the guarantee is approved by the agency.

(2) Approved for guarantee by another governmental loan guarantee authority, and the minimum amount of the guarantee
 is not less than 50 percent of the principal amount of the loan.

(3) Made pursuant to the corporation’s participation with the Small Business Administration as a small business investment company or local development company.

(4) Less than 16 percent of the total financing package arranged between the corporation and another lender or lenders on behalf of the applicant.

(b) This section does not apply to loans made pursuant to Section 32724.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 929, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

32601.

The corporation shall not provide financing assistance on any application, except for any application submitted for review as a special project, which has not been reviewed in the manner specified by the board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1040, Sec. 18.5.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Miscellaneous [32720. - 32724.]



  ARTICLE 3. Special Projects [32720. - 32724.]

32720.

The corporation is authorized to accept any public or private financial grant in furtherance of the purposes of this division, including, but not limited to, grants for alternative energy research or demonstration projects, manpower training, or economic development.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32721.

The board may consider and adopt rules for the acceptance and disbursement of grants, provided, however, that the cost of administering any grant, less any payment for grant administration made to the corporation by the granting authority, shall in no case exceed 5 percent of the operating budget of the corporation in any calendar year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 25, Sec. 16.   Effective March 17, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

32722.

The corporation may participate with any federal or state governmental agency, department, board, bureau, or office in any program which is intended to assist the development of the alternative energy industry or to encourage economic development.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 25, Sec. 17.   Effective March 17, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

32723.

The corporation may develop and implement a program to assist private financial institutions, to evaluate investment opportunities in alternative energy systems, and to help potential small business borrowers make contact with appropriate private sources of funds for alternative energy investments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32724.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, loans or other financing programs undertaken by the corporation in furtherance of minority enterprises and export financing shall be funded from the enterprise loan fund, or other accounts which the corporation may establish. The board shall promulgate separate loan review procedures and criteria which shall be applicable to loans and other financing programs implemented by the corporation pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1040, Sec. 18.7.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Borrowing From the State [32810. - 32823.]



  ARTICLE 2. State Enterprise Loan Fund [32810. - 32814.]

32810.

The Controller shall establish, maintain, and administer a separate account within the General Fund of the State of California to effect the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32811.

The name of this account shall be the “State Enterprise Loan Fund,” which fund shall be continuously appropriated for the purposes of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1040, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

32812.

The Controller shall transfer into the fund from the General Fund and from the Energy Resources Program Account in the General Fund all moneys required to meet the loan requests of the corporation, subject to the following terms and conditions:

(a) The amount transferred to the fund from the General Fund shall not exceed one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000).

(b) The amount transferred to the fund from the Energy Resources Programs Account in the General Fund shall not exceed one
 million dollars ($1,000,000) and the Controller shall not transfer any money from the account to the fund unless and until both of the following occur:

(1) The corporation certifies to the Controller that it has approved not less than a total of five million dollars ($5,000,000) in loans to eligible small businesses in this state.

(2) The corporation certifies to the Controller that it will use the additional money transferred to the fund only to make new loans to eligible small businesses in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 323, Sec. 31.   Effective July 1, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

32813.

The Controller shall disburse moneys from the fund to the corporation subject to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32814.

The Controller shall deposit in the fund all moneys received from the corporation in repayment of the principal and interest of loans made to the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Borrowing from the Fund [32820. - 32823.]

32820.

The corporation is authorized to borrow money from the fund, subject to the following terms and conditions:

(a) The interest rate on loans from the fund to the corporation shall be six percent per annum;

(b) The maximum term of the loans to the corporation shall be for 20 years;

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32820.5.

Upon approval of the corporation to exercise the powers of a small business development corporation pursuant to Section 32352, the corporation shall cease to be liable for payment of interest on loans made or to be made from the fund pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1040, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

32821.

The corporation shall make application in writing to the Controller for loans from the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32822.

Within five working days after receipt of an application from the corporation for a loan from the fund, the Controller shall disburse the proceeds of the loan to the corporation, unless:

(a) The corporation is in default on any previous loan from the fund; or

(b) In order to lend the amount requested by the corporation, the Controller would be required to transfer to the fund amounts which cumulatively would exceed the maximum amount specified in Section 32812.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 323, Sec. 31.5.   Effective July 1, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

32823.

If the Controller finds either subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 32822 to be the case, the Controller shall deny the loan application of the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 19. RELEASE OF DEMAND DEPOSIT FUNDS [40500. - 40501.]

40500.

It is the intent of the Legislature that a financial institution shall not transfer funds from a depositor’s account unless authorization has been granted by that depositor. This division is declaratory of existing case law and is intended to codify the law for the convenience of the public, regulatory authorities, and financial institutions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1057, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

40501.

In accordance with the implied contract existing between a financial institution and its depositor, no bank, savings association, credit union, or other financial institution operating in this state which maintains and services demand deposit accounts, including NOW accounts, may release any funds from those accounts to any person or entity who is not the account holder, unless the funds are released pursuant to the depositor’s authorization or in accordance with the law. This section does not apply to any setoff for a debt claimed to be owed to a bank, savings association, credit union, or other financial institution by a customer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1057, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 20. CALIFORNIA RESIDENTIAL MORTGAGE LENDING ACT [50000. - 50706.]



CHAPTER 1. General [50000. - 50006.]

50000.

This division will be known and may be cited as the California Residential Mortgage Lending Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 994, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Section operative January 1, 1996, pursuant to Section 50601 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------

50001.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this chapter apply throughout this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 994, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Section operative January 1, 1996, pursuant to Section 50601 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------

50002.

(a) No person shall engage in the business of making residential mortgage loans or servicing residential mortgage loans, in this state, without first obtaining a license from the commissioner in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 50120) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 50130), and any rules promulgated by the commissioner under this law, unless a person or transaction is excepted from a definition or exempt from licensure by a provision of this law or a rule of the commissioner.

(b) (1) An employee of a licensee or of a person exempt from licensure is not required to be licensed when acting within the scope of his or her
 employment and shall be exempt from any other law from which his or her employer is exempt, except that an individual who meets the definition of a mortgage loan originator in Section 50003.5 shall be subject to this division.

(2) A person exempt from this division may apply to the commissioner for an exempt company registration for the purpose of sponsoring one or more individuals required to be licensed as mortgage loan originators as defined in Section 50003.5 and pursuant to the SAFE Act.

(3) An exempt person applying under the exempt company registration procedure shall comply with all rules
 and orders that the commissioner deems necessary to ensure compliance with the SAFE Act and shall pay an annual registration fee established by the commissioner.

(c) The following persons are exempt from subdivision (a):

(1) Any bank, trust company, insurance company, or industrial loan company doing business under the authority of, or in accordance with, a license, certificate, or charter issued by the United States or any state, district, territory, or commonwealth of the United States that is authorized to transact business in this state.

(2) A federally chartered savings and loan association, federal savings bank, or federal credit union that is authorized to transact business in this state.

(3) A savings and loan association, savings bank, or credit union organized under the laws of this or any other state that is authorized to transact business in this state.

(4) A person engaged solely in business, commercial, or agricultural mortgage lending.

(5) A wholly owned service corporation of a savings and loan association or savings bank organized under the laws of this state or the wholly owned service corporation of a federally chartered savings and loan association or savings bank that is authorized to transact business in this state.

(6) An agency or other instrumentality of the federal government, or state or municipal government.

(7) An employee or employer pension plan making residential mortgage loans only to its participants, or a person making those loans only to its employees or the employees of a holding company, or an owner who controls that person, affiliate, or subsidiary of that person.

(8) A person acting in a fiduciary capacity conferred by the authority of a court.

(9) A real estate broker licensed under California law, when making, arranging, selling, or servicing a residential loan.

(10) A California finance lender or broker licensed under Division 9 (commencing with Section 22000), when acting under the authority of that license.

(11) A trustee under a deed of trust pursuant to the Civil Code, when collecting delinquent loan payments, interest, or other loan amounts, or performing other acts in a judicial or nonjudicial foreclosure proceeding.

(12) A mortgage loan originator who has obtained a license
 under Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 50140), provided that the mortgage loan originator is employed by a residential mortgage lender or servicer.

(13) A registered mortgage loan originator described in subdivision (e).

(d) An individual, unless specifically exempted under subdivision (e), shall not engage in the business of a mortgage loan originator with respect to any dwelling located in this state without first obtaining and maintaining annually a license in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 50140) and any rules promulgated by the commissioner under that chapter. Each licensed mortgage loan originator shall register with and maintain a valid unique identifier issued by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and
 Registry.

(e) A registered mortgage loan originator is exempt from licensure under subdivisions (a) and (d), when he or she is employed by a depository institution, a subsidiary of a depository institution that is owned and controlled by a depository institution and regulated by a federal banking agency, or an institution regulated by the Farm Credit Administration.

(f) A loan processor or underwriter who is an independent contractor employed by a residential mortgage lender or servicer may not perform the activities of a loan processor or underwriter under this division unless the independent contractor loan processor or underwriter obtains and maintains a license under Section 50120.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 264, Sec. 8.   (AB 2666)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

50002.5.

(a) Every licensee engaging in the business of making, servicing, or making and servicing residential mortgage loans shall require that every mortgage loan originator employed or compensated by that licensee obtains and maintains a mortgage loan originator license from the commissioner under this division or Division 9 (commencing with Section 22000), or has first obtained a license endorsement from the
 commissioner of Real Estate pursuant to Article 2.1 (commencing with Section 10166.01) of Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code.

(b) A residential mortgage lender or servicer shall not employ a mortgage loan originator whose license or license endorsement has lapsed.

(c) A residential mortgage lender or servicer may not make or broker a residential mortgage loan unless that loan is negotiated by or applied for through a licensed mortgage loan originator.

(d) Every licensee engaged in the business of making, servicing, or making and servicing residential mortgage loans and every mortgage loan originator licensed under this division shall register with and maintain a valid unique identifier issued by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

(e) No mortgage loan originator licensed under this division and employed by a licensed residential mortgage lender or residential mortgage servicer shall engage in any activity that is not an authorized activity for a licensed residential mortgage lender or residential mortgage servicer pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 46.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

50003.

(a) “Annual audit” means a certified audit of the licensee’s books, records, and systems of internal control performed by an independent certified public accountant in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and generally accepted auditing standards.

(b) “Borrower” means the loan applicant.

(c) “Buy” includes exchange, offer to buy, or solicitation to buy.

(d) “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(e) “Control” means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct, or cause the direction of, the